Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-821
Ballots; delivery to election officials; unofficial ballots; when authorized.

Before the opening of the polls the election commissioner, county clerk, or city or village clerk shall cause to be delivered to the judges of election at each polling place the proper number of ballots as provided for in section 32-807. The ballots for each precinct shall be enclosed in a sealed packet marked with the proper designation of the precinct, and at the opening of the polls, the package of ballots shall be publicly broken by one of the judges of election. If for any cause the official ballots prepared by the election commissioner, county clerk, or city or village clerk are not ready for distribution at any polling place or if the supply of ballots is exhausted before the polls are closed, printed, copied, or written ballots which are as nearly as possible in the form of official ballots may be used.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 242.